Utah statutes.
78B-15-704.   Consent to assisted reproduction.

(1)  A consent to assisted reproduction by a married woman must be in a record signed by the woman and her husband.  This requirement does not apply to the donation of eggs for assisted reproduction by another woman.

(2)  Failure of the husband to sign a consent required by Subsection (1), before or after the birth of the child, does not preclude a finding that the husband is the father of a child born to his wife if the wife and husband openly treat the child as their own.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

